Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1319
Participant; status as volunteer.

The participation of a volunteer in any service award benefit program conducted pursuant to the Volunteer Emergency Responders Recruitment and Retention Act and his or her receipt of service award benefits pursuant to such a program shall not for that cause alone alter the relationship of such volunteer to the city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district as being one of a volunteer for purposes of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 19.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.